New York, session 2025-2026, A10351.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 82-c of the civil service law, as added by chapter 2 438 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 82-c. Civil air patrol volunteers; paid leave. Notwithstanding any 4 other provisions of law to the contrary, public officers and employees 5 of the state who are members of the United States Air Force Auxiliary 6 Civil Air Patrol or the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary Pilots shall 7 be granted leave from work with pay to participate in emergency services 8 during a declared state of emergency upon a written request from a unit 9 commander and the approval of the chief administrative officer of the 10 state agency, department or bureau for which the public officer or 11 employee serves or during an air force assigned mission. The public 12 officer or employee shall be compensated at [his or her] their regular 13 rate of pay for those regular work hours during which the public officer 14 or employee is absent from work while participating in emergency 15 services missions during a declared state of emergency or during an air 16 force assigned mission. Such leave shall be provided without loss of 17 seniority, compensation, sick leave, vacation leave or other overtime 18 compensation to which the volunteer is otherwise entitled and shall not 19 exceed twenty days in any calendar year. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14265-01-5